Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.645.010

Appeals—Notice of—Scope—Time limitation.

(1) Any person, or persons, either severally or collectively, aggrieved by any decision or order of any school official or board, within thirty days after the rendition of such decision or order, or of the failure to act upon the same when properly presented, may appeal the same to the superior court of the county in which the school district or part thereof is situated, by filing with the secretary of the school board if the appeal is from board action or failure to act, otherwise with the proper school official, and filing with the clerk of the superior court, a notice of appeal which shall set forth in a clear and concise manner the errors complained of.

(2)(a) Appeals by teachers, principals, supervisors, superintendents, or other certificated employees from the actions of school boards with respect to discharge or other action adversely affecting their contract status, or failure to renew their contracts for the next ensuing term shall be governed by the appeal provisions of chapters 28A.400 and 28A.405 RCW therefor and in all other cases shall be governed by chapter 28A.645 RCW.

(b) Appeals from nonrenewal or discharge by employees of school districts that are dissolved due to financial insolvency shall be as provided in RCW 28A.315.229.

[ 2012 c 186 s 22; 1990 c 33 s 544; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 40; 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 17; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.88.010. Prior: 1961 c 241 s 9; 1909 c 97 p 362 s 1; RRS s 5064. Formerly RCW 28A.88.010, 28.88.010.] [SLC-RO-1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 186: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.

Rule-making authority—2012 c 186: See RCW 28A.315.902.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.

RCW 28A.645.010 not applicable to contract renewal of school superintendent: RCW 28A.400.010.